Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-1401.43
Stop-sale order, defined.

Stop-sale order means a notification issued by a manufacturer, distributor, factory branch, or distributor branch to its franchised new motor vehicle dealers stating that certain used motor vehicles in inventory shall not be sold or leased, at either retail or wholesale, due to a federal safety recall for a defect or a noncompliance or due to a federal emissions recall.

Laws 2018, LB909, § 114.